Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:(1) Any city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 must allow up to two mobile dwellings on each lot zoned for residential use if the following conditions are met:(a) The lot has at least one existing housing unit;(b) The lot is located within an urban growth area; and(c) A mobile dwelling is not located in shorelines of the state as defined in RCW 90.58.030 or in natural resource lands and critical areas designated under RCW 36.70A.170.(2) A mobile dwelling must be connected to electrical service through a dedicated outlet on a service pedestal or on the primary dwelling, which must be a minimum 20-amp, ground fault circuit interrupter protected, dedicated circuit.(3)(a) If a mobile dwelling has internal plumbing, it must be connected to potable water and sanitary sewer services as follows:(i) Water connections may be made through a sanitary yard hydrant certified for potable use or an antisiphon hose bib certified for potable use from an existing home on the lot, with connections from the vehicle to the hose bib made with a flexible hose rated for potable water, and an approved double check valve assembly must be installed downstream of the water meter and inspected and reported as required by the water system; and(ii) Sewer and sanitary connections may be made through a permitted sewer lateral clean out from the sanitary sewer line of an existing housing unit on the property.(b) If a mobile dwelling does not have internal plumbing, the occupants must have access to potable water, toilets, and showers in an existing housing unit on the lot.(4) Cities and counties must use standard permitting and inspection procedures for new utility hookups for mobile dwellings, including electric, water, and sewer cleanouts. Cities and counties may not require inspection of the mobile dwelling itself.(5) For the purposes of this section, "mobile dwelling" means:(a) A vehicular-type unit primarily designed for recreational camping or travel use that has its own motive power or is mounted on or towed by another vehicle, including travel trailers, fifth-wheel trailers, folding camping trailers, truck campers, and motor homes; or(b) A tiny house with wheels.(6) A city required to submit its next comprehensive plan update in 2027, pursuant to RCW 36.70A.130, must adopt or amend by ordinance, and incorporate into its development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls, the requirements of this section in its next comprehensive plan update. All other cities required to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 must implement the requirements of this section within two years of the effective date of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 64.32 RCW to read as follows:(1) On or after the effective date of this section, an association of apartment owners for a property located within a city or county subject to the requirements in section 1 of this act may not create a restriction, covenant, condition, declaration, bylaw, rule, provision of a governing document, or a master deed provision that actively or effectively prohibits up to two mobile dwellings on each lot zoned for residential use as required in section 1 of this act.(2) This section expires January 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 64.34 RCW to read as follows:(1) On or after the effective date of this section, an association for a condominium located within a city or county subject to the requirements in section 1 of this act may not create a restriction, covenant, condition, declaration, bylaw, rule, provision of a governing document, or a master deed provision that actively or effectively prohibits up to two mobile dwellings on each lot zoned for residential use as required in section 1 of this act.(2) This section expires January 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW to read as follows:(1) On or after the effective date of this section, a homeowners' association for property located in a city or county subject to the requirements in section 1 of this act may not create a restriction, covenant, condition, declaration, bylaw, rule, provision of a governing document, or a master deed provision that actively or effectively prohibits up to two mobile dwellings on each lot zoned for residential use as required in section 1 of this act.(2) This section expires January 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 64.90 RCW to read as follows:On or after the effective date of this section, an association or a declarant for a common interest community located within a city or county subject to the requirements in section 1 of this act may not create a restriction, covenant, condition, declaration, bylaw, rule, provision of a governing document, or a master deed provision that actively or effectively prohibits up to two mobile dwellings on each lot zoned for residential use as required in section 1 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2025, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.--- END ---